District of Columbia statutes.
36-153

Unauthorized use, defacing, or sale of registered vessel.

Whoever, except the person who shall have filed and published a description of the same as aforesaid, fills with milk or cream, or other beverage, as aforesaid, with intent to sell the same, any vessel so marked and distinguished as aforesaid, the description of which shall have been filed and published as provided in § 36-152, or defaces, erases, covers up, or otherwise removes or conceals any such name or mark as aforesaid, or the word “registered,” thereon, or sells, buys, gives, takes, or otherwise disposes of, or traffics in the same without having purchased the contents thereof from the person whose name is in or upon such vessel, or without the written consent of such person, shall, for the 1st offense, be punished by a fine of not less than $.50 for each such vessel, or by imprisonment for not less than 10 days nor more than 1 year, or by both such fine and imprisonment; and for each subsequent offense by a fine of not less than $1 nor more than $5 for each such vessel, or by imprisonment for not less than 20 days nor more than 1 year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 878c
Feb. 27, 1907, 34 Stat. 1007, ch. 2086
Deceptive imitation of goods, criminal penalty, see § 22-1502.
This section is referenced in § 36-154.
1981 Ed., § 48-303.
1973 Ed., § 48-303.